Hawaii statutes.
§11-136 Poll book, identification, voting.
Every person upon applying to vote shall sign the person's name in the poll
book prepared for that purpose. This requirement may be waived by the
chairperson of the precinct officials if for reasons of illiteracy or blindness
or other physical disability the voter is unable to write. Every person shall
provide identification if so requested by a precinct official. A poll book
shall not contain the social security number of any person.

After signing the poll book and receiving the
voter's ballot, the voter shall proceed to the voting booth to vote according
to the voting system in use in the voter's precinct. The precinct official may,
and upon request shall, explain to the voter the mode of voting. [L 1970, c 26,
pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §1(qq); gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 2003, c 23, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next